apertium-chv-tat.chv.twol
Alphabet

 А Ӑ Б В Г Д Е   Ё Ж З И Й К Л М Н О П Р С Ҫ Т У  Ф Х Ц Ч Ш Щ Ъ Ы Ь Э Ю Я  
 а ӑ б в г д е ӗ ё ж з и й к л м н о п р с ҫ т у ӳ ф х ц ч ш щ ъ ы ь э ю я 

 %{И%}:и

 %>:0 ;

Sets

Vow = А О Ы У Я Ю Ӑ Е Э И Ү
      а о ы у я ю ӑ е э и ӳ ӗ;

Soglasnaja = Б В Г Д Ж З Й К Л М Н П Р С Ҫ Т Ф Х Ц Ч Ш Щ Ъ Ь   
             б в г д ж з й к л м н п р с ҫ т ф х ц ч ш щ ъ ь ;

Rules

"Remove morpheme boundary"
%>:0 <=> _ ;

"...."
%{И%}:ӗ <=> Soglasnaja %>: _ ;
